Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Joinder of Other Municipalities and Supervisors District in Which Situated With Municipality in Establishing Industrial Enterprises

§ 57-1-101.
Declaration of intention; petition for and issuance of certificate.

When a city, town or village and the supervisors district wherein such city, town or village is situated desire to enter jointly into the establishment of an industrial enterprise under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, the governing body of such city, town or village and the board of supervisors of the county in which such supervisors district is situated shall each declare its intention of entering into such plan by resolution spread upon its minutes, and they shall jointly file with the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, a petition for a joint certificate of public convenience and necessity in the manner and for the purposes prescribed by Section 57-1-21. Such joint petition for such joint certificate of public convenience and necessity shall, in addition to any other information required to be furnished, set out the amount of bonds or other expenditures such city, town or village and such supervisors district propose separately to issue or make for such enterprise. The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board is authorized and empowered to issue or refuse to issue such joint certificate of public convenience and necessity in accordance with the provisions of Section 57-1-21, except that such certificate when issued shall be entitled and be a joint certificate of public convenience and necessity. Where such a petition for a joint certificate is filed, the board, in addition to the findings prescribed by Section 57-1-21, shall before it issues such joint certificate also find and determine affirmatively that the aggregate bonded indebtedness of such city, town or village and such supervisors district incurred under the provisions of Sections 57-1-101 through 57-1-107, shall not exceed the aggregate of twenty per cent (20%) of the total assessed valuation of all the property in the city, town or village, computed as in the case of an application by such city, town or village alone, plus twenty percent (20%) of the total assessed valuation of all the property in the supervisors district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-41; Laws, 1952, ch. 421, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1958, ch. 526, §§ 2-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 212, §§ 1-3.

§ 57-1-103.
Election.

Should such joint certificate of public convenience and necessity be issued by the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, the governing authority of such city, town or village shall direct the holding of an election in the manner provided as to it by Section 57-1-25, and the board of supervisors of the county in which such supervisors district is situated shall direct the holding of a separate election in such supervisors district in the manner provided by Section 57-1-25 for such elections. In the event the proposal be approved as required by Section 57-1-25, both in the election for the supervisors district and in the election for the city, town or village, computed and declared separately, then the board of supervisors and the governing authority of such city, town or village, respectively, may issue the bonds authorized by said elections, respectively, as provided by the aforesaid Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-41; Laws, 1952, ch. 421, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1958, ch. 526, §§ 2-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 212, §§ 1-3.

§ 57-1-105.
Powers and rights of city, town or village and supervisors district.

When a city, town or village and the supervisors district wherein such city, town or village is situated join for the establishment of an industrial enterprise under the provisions of Sections 57-1-101 through 57-1-107 they shall be and they are hereby authorized to exercise the powers conferred by Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51; and for the purpose of carrying out such joint industrial enterprise, all provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, so far as the same are applicable, shall apply to all proceedings by such city, town or village and to all proceedings by such board of supervisors for the county in which such supervisors district is situated. The city, town or village and the supervisors district so joining shall have each an undivided interest in the industrial enterprise, including any land acquired for such purpose, in the same proportion as the amount of bonds issued by each bears to the total issued by both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-41; Laws, 1952, ch. 421, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1958, ch. 526, §§ 2-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 212, §§ 1-3.

§ 57-1-107.
Contracts.

When a city, town or village and the supervisors district wherein such city, town or village is situated join as provided in Sections 57-1-101 through 57-1-107 for the establishment of an industrial enterprise under the provisions of said sections, they shall be and are hereby authorized to contract jointly for the acquisition of land and to jointly enter into contracts for the purpose of establishing, operating, maintaining or leasing such industrial enterprise, including contracts for the construction thereof; or they may, by agreement adopted by resolution spread upon the minutes of the governing authority of such city, town or village and upon the minutes of the board of supervisors of the county, authorize either the governing authority of such city, town or village or the board of supervisors to enter into such contracts for and on behalf of both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-41; Laws, 1952, ch. 421, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1958, ch. 526, §§ 2-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 212, §§ 1-3.